Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1117.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 626.8452, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Prohibition on disarming local law enforcement officers. new text end new text begin Unless expressly authorized under another section of law, a mayor, city council, county board, or chief law enforcement officer may not disarm a peace officer who is in good standing and not currently under investigation or subject to disciplinary action. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end